District of Columbia statutes.
38-751.04

Survey.

The Mayor shall survey a sample of schools to identify existing initiatives used to support high school and college readiness and increase graduation rates. Results of the survey shall be submitted to the Council within 90 days of June 19, 2012.

June 19, 2012, D.C. Law 19-142, § 104, 59 DCR 3642